Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1175.1, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 364, O.S.L. 2025 (22 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1175.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1175.1. As used in Sections 1175.1 through 1176 of this
title:
1. "Competent" or "competency" means the present ability of a
person arrested for or charged with a crime to understand the nature
of the charges and proceedings brought against him or her and to
effectively and rationally assist in his or her defense;
2. "Criminal proceeding" means every stage of a criminal
prosecution after arrest and before judgment, including, but not
limited to, interrogation, lineup, preliminary hearing, motion
dockets, discovery, pretrial hearings and trial;


Req. No. 16023 Page 2

3. "Dangerous" means a person who is a person requiring
treatment as defined in Section 1-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
4. "Incompetent" or "incompetency" means the present inability
of a person arrested for or charged with a crime to understand the
nature of the charges and proceedings brought against him or her and
to effectively and rationally assist in his or her defense;
5. "Public guardian" means the Office of Public Guardian as
established under the Oklahoma Public Guardianship Act in Section 6-
101 et seq. of Title 30 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. "Qualified forensic examiner evaluator" means any:
a. psychiatrist with forensic training and experience,
b. psychologist with forensic training and experience, or
c. a licensed mental health professional whose forensic
training and experience enable him or her to form
expert opinions regarding mental illness, competency
and dangerousness and who has been approved to render
such opinions by the court; provided, however, a
licensed mental health professional shall not be
qualified to issue expert opinions as to competency or
dangerousness in cases in which a person is alleged to
be incompetent due to intellectual disability; and
7. "Reasonable period of time" means a period not to exceed the
lesser of:
Req. No. 16023 Page 3

a. the maximum sentence specified for the most serious
offense with which the defendant is charged, or
b. a maximum period of two (2) years.
Any time period where the defendant refuses medication
prescribed or ordered that is designed to restore the defendant to
competency shall not be used in the calculation of a reasonable
period of time.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1175.3, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 73, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1175.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1175.3. A. Upon filing of an application for
determination of competency, the court shall set a hearing date,
which shall be as soon as practicable, but at least one (1) day
after service of notice as provided by Section 1175.2 of this title.
B. The court shall hold a hearing on the date provided. At the
hearing, the court shall examine the application for determination
of competency to determine if it alleges facts sufficient to raise a
doubt as to the competency of the person. Any additional evidence
tending to create a doubt as to the competency of the person may be
presented at this hearing.
C. If the court finds there is no doubt as to the competency of
the person, it shall order the criminal proceedings to resume.
D. 1. a. If the court finds there is a doubt as to the
competency of the person, it shall order the person to
Req. No. 16023 Page 4

be examined evaluated by the Department of Mental
Health and Substance Abuse Services or by a qualified
forensic examiner evaluator designated by the
Department to perform competency examinations
evaluations.
b. In addition, the Developmental Disabilities Services
Division and the Office of Public Guardian of the
Department of Human Services shall receive written
notice from the district attorney who filed the
criminal petition, and be authorized by order of the
court to have a psychologist or other appropriate
clinician participate with professionals assigned by
any other public or private agency in any competency
evaluation where developmental or intellectual
disability may be involved. The psychologist or
clinician employed, by contract or otherwise, by the
Department of Human Services may issue a separate
opinion and recommendation to the court. In such
cases where intellectual disability may be involved,
the Office of Public Guardian shall have standing to
participate in any stage of the proceedings as deemed
necessary by the Office.
2. The person shall be examined evaluated by a qualified
forensic examiner evaluator on an outpatient basis prior to referral
Req. No. 16023 Page 5

for any necessary inpatient evaluation, as ordered by the court.
The outpatient examination evaluation may be conducted in the
community, the jail or detention facility where the person is held.
3. If the court determines that the person whose competency is
in question may be dangerous as defined in Section 1175.1 of this
title, it shall order the person retained in a secure facility until
the completion of the competency hearing provided in Section 1175.4
of this title. If the court determines the person may be dangerous
as defined in Section 1175.1 of this title because the individual is
a person requiring treatment as defined in Section 1-103 of Title
43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, it may commit the person to the
custody of the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services or any other state agency or private facility for the
examination evaluation required by this subsection. The person
shall be required to undergo examination evaluation for a period of
time sufficient for the qualified forensic examiner evaluator or
examiners evaluators to reach a conclusion as to competency, and the
court shall impose a reasonable time limitation for such period of
examination evaluation.
E. The qualified forensic examiner evaluator or examiners
evaluators shall receive instructions that they shall examine
evaluate the patient person to determine:
1. If the person is able to appreciate the nature of the
charges made against such person;
Req. No. 16023 Page 6

2. If the person is able to consult with the lawyer and
rationally assist in the preparation of the defense of such person;
3. If the person is unable to appreciate the nature of the
charges or to consult and rationally assist in the preparation of
the defense, whether the person can attain competency within a
reasonable period of time as defined in Section 1175.1 of this title
if provided with a course of treatment, therapy or training;
4. If the person is a person requiring treatment as defined by
Section 1-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. If the person is incompetent because the person is
intellectually disabled as defined in Section 1408 of Title 10 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. If the requirements of paragraphs 4 and 5 of this subsection
are not established, the reasoning for which the defendant is
otherwise incompetent; and
7. If the person were released, whether such person would
presently be dangerous as defined in Section 1175.1 of this title.
F. Upon completion of the competency evaluation, the Department
of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services or qualified forensic
examiner evaluator designated by the Department to perform
competency examinations evaluations shall notify the court of its
findings. If the person is in the custody of the Department of
Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services, the person shall be
returned to the court in the customary manner within five (5)
Req. No. 16023 Page 7

busi ness days. If the person is not returned within that time, the
county in which the proceedings are to be held shall pay the costs
of maintaining the person at the institution or facility for the
period of time the person remains at the institution or facility in
excess of the five-day period.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1175.4, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 73, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1175.4), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1175.4. A. A hearing to determine the competency of
the person whose competency is in question shall be held within
thirty (30) days after the qualified forensic examiner evaluator or
examiners evaluators have made the determination required in Section
1175.3 of this title. In such cases where intellectual disability
may be involved, the Office of Public Guardian shall have standing
to participate in any stage of the proceedings as deemed necessary
by the Office.
B. The court, at the hearing, shall determine by a
preponderance of the evidence if the person is incompetent. Such
determination shall include consideration of all reports prepared by
the qualified forensic examiner evaluator or examiners evaluators;
provided, however, in any case where intellectual disability may be
involved, the recommendations of examiners evaluators set forth in
subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of subsection D of Section 1175.3 of
this title shall be considered by the court. The person shall be
Req. No. 16023 Page 8

pres umed to be competent for the purposes of the allocation of the
burden of proof and burden of going forward with the evidence. If
the court deems it necessary, or if the person alleged to be a
person requiring treatment, or any relative, friend, or any person
with whom he may reside, or at whose house the person may be, shall
so demand, the court shall schedule the hearing on the application
as a jury trial to be held within seventy-two (72) hours of the
request, excluding weekends and legal holidays, or within as much
additional time as is requested by the attorney of the person whose
competency is in question, upon good cause shown. The jury shall be
composed of six (6) persons having the qualifications required of
jurors in courts of record, summoned to determine the questions of
the person's competency of the person and need for treatment.
Whenever a jury is required, the court shall proceed to the
selection of such jury in the manner as provided by law and such
jury shall determine the questions of the competency and need for
treatment of the person whose competency is in question. The jurors
shall receive fees for attendance and mileage as are allowed by law.
C. The person whose competency is in question shall have the
right to be present at the hearing on the petition unless it is made
to appear to the court that the presence of the person makes it
impossible to conduct the hearing in a reasonable manner. The court
may not decide in advance of the hearing, solely on the basis of the
certificate of the examining doctor or doctors qualified forensic
Req. No. 16023 Page 9

eval uator, that the person whose competency is in question should
not be allowed to appear. It shall be made to appear to the court
based on clear and convincing evidence that alternatives to
exclusion were attempted before the court renders the person's
removal of the person for that purpose or the person's appearance of
the person at such hearing improper and unsafe.
D. All witnesses shall be subject to cross-examination in the
same manner as is provided by law. If so stipulated by counsel for
a person whose competency is in question, the district attorney and
the court, testimony may be given by telephone or other electronic
transmitting device approved by the court. No statement, admission
or confession made by the person whose competency is in question
obtained during the examination evaluation for competency may be
used for any purpose except for proceedings under Section 1175.1 et
seq. of this title. No such statement, admission or confession may
be used against such person in any criminal action whether pending
at the time the hearing is held or filed against such person at any
later time, directly, indirectly or in any manner or form.
E. If the question of competency is submitted to a jury, the
court shall instruct the jury as to the law regarding competency,
and the findings they are to make. If the trial of the question is
to the court, the court shall make the required findings.


Req. No. 16023 Page 10

SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1175.6b, as
amended by Section 4, Chapter 73, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1175.6b), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1175.6b. A. If the person is found to be incompetent
primarily because the person is intellectually disabled, as defined
in Section 1408 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and is also
found by the court to be dangerous, as defined by Section 1175.1 of
this title, the court shall suspend the criminal proceedings and
place the person into the custody of the Office of Public Guardian.
The Office of Public Guardian shall act with all powers set forth in
the Oklahoma Public Guardianship Act, and:
1. The Office of Public Guardian shall place any person placed
in its custody under this title in a facility or residential
setting, private or public, willing to accept the individual and
that has a level of supervision and security that is appropriate to
the needs of the person;
2. Such placements shall be within the sole discretion of the
Office of Public Guardian;
3. All such placements made by the Office of Public Guardian
shall be made within six (6) months of the date of the order
awarding custody to the Office of Public Guardian;
4. The Office of Public Guardian shall report to the court at
least every six (6) months as to the status of the person including,
but not limited to, the type of placement, services provided, level
Req. No. 16023 Page 11

of s upervision, the medical and psychological health of the person,
whether the person would be dangerous if conditionally released into
a nonsecure environment, the assistance and services that would be
required for such conditional release and whether the person has
achieved competency;
5. If the person is determined by the Office of Public Guardian
to have regained competency or that conditional release to a private
guardian or other caretaker is appropriate, a hearing shall be
scheduled within twenty (20) days. If found competent by the court
or a jury after such rehearing, criminal proceedings shall be
resumed. If the court finds conditional release to be appropriate,
the court shall make an appropriate order for conditional release;
and
6. The provisions of subsections C, H and I of Section 6-101 of
Title 30 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not apply to custody orders
arising under this title.
B. If the person is found to be incompetent for reasons other
than the person is a person requiring treatment as defined by
Section 1-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes and is found to
be not dangerous as defined by Section 1175.1 of this title, the
court shall suspend the criminal proceedings and either refer the
person to the Department of Human Services for consideration of
voluntary assistance or conditionally release the person as set
forth in this section.
Req. No. 16023 Page 12

1. For any person recommended for conditional release, a
written plan for services shall be prepared by the Department of
Human Services and filed with the court. In its order of
conditional release, the court shall specify the conditions of
release and shall direct the appropriate agencies or persons to
submit annual reports regarding the person's compliance of the
person with the conditions of release and progress:
a. to be eligible for conditional release, the person
shall agree, in writing, that during the period the
person is granted conditional release and is subject
to the provisions thereof, there shall be free
transmission of all pertinent information, including
clinical information regarding the person, among the
person's treatment providers of the person, the
appropriate district attorneys, law enforcement and
court personnel. To effect this agreement, the person
shall execute any releases required by law to allow
for the dissemination of this information,
b. the court's order of the court placing the person on
conditional release shall include notice that the
person's conditional release of the person may be
revoked upon good cause,
c. the district attorney, as well as any agency or
individual involved in providing services with regard
Req. No. 16023 Page 13

to the person's conditional release of the person, may
prepare and file an affidavit under oath if the
district attorney, agency, or individual believes that
the person has failed to comply with the conditions of
release. The court shall then conduct a hearing to
determine if the person has violated the conditions of
release. Notice of the hearing shall be issued, at
least twenty-four (24) hours before the hearing, to
the Department of Human Services, the person, trial
counsel for the person, and the client advocate
general of the Department of Human Services. After
reviewing the evidence concerning any alleged
violation of the conditions of the release, the
person's progress of the person, treatment
alternatives, and the need for public safety, the
court may order no change to the conditions for the
person's release of the person or modify the
conditions of release, and
d. the person placed on conditional release shall remain
in a conditional release status until the reviewing
court issues a full release from all conditions.
2. If the person is not committed to the custody of the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services, the court
shall appoint a medical supervisor for a course of treatment. The
Req. No. 16023 Page 14

medi cal supervisor of treatment may be any person or agency that
agrees to supervise the course of treatment. The proposed treatment
may be either inpatient or outpatient care depending on the
facilities and resources available to the court and the type of
disability sought to be corrected by the court order. The court
shall require the medical supervisor to provide periodic progress
reports to the court and may pay for the services of the medical
supervisor from court funds.
3. If the person is determined by the Department of Human
Services to have regained competency, a hearing shall be scheduled
within twenty (20) days:
a. if found competent by the court or a jury after such
rehearing, criminal proceedings shall be resumed,
b. if the person is found to continue to be incompetent,
the person shall be returned to either conditional
release or referred to the Department of Human
Services for consideration of voluntary assistance.
C. The Office of Public Guardian shall have standing to
participate in any proceeding held pursuant to this section as
deemed necessary by the Office.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1175.7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1175.7. A. If the person is found incompetent and is
committed to the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Req. No. 16023 Page 15

Serv ices pursuant to Section 1175.6a of this title, but capable of
achieving competency within a reasonable period of time, as defined
by the court, the court shall order such person to undergo such
treatment, therapy or training which is calculated to allow the
person to achieve competence. In determining the appropriate form,
setting, and conditions of such treatment, the court shall consider

the recommendation of a qualified forensic evaluator, including

whether competency restoration may be safely and effectively

provided through a structured jail-based restoration program,

community-based outpatient competency restoration program, or

inpatient restoration program. All restoration programs, no matter

the venue, shall provide the structured, curriculum driven education

which is to be maintained by the Department.

B. If the person is not committed to the custody of the

Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services, the When

the court shall appoint a medical supervisor for a course of

treatment. The medical supervisor of treatment may be any person or

agency that agrees to supervise the course of treatment. The

proposed treatment may be either inpatient or orders an individual

to participate in community-based outpatient care depending on the

facilities and resources available to the court and the type of

disability sought to be corrected by the court's competency

restoration based on a recommendation of a qualified forensic

evaluator, the order. The court shall require the supervisor to
Req. No. 16023 Page 16

prov ide periodic progress reports to the court and may pay for the
services of the medical supervisor from court funds consent of the
individual and compliance with all terms and conditions of the
community-based outpatient competency restoration program of the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services and any
other court-ordered release conditions. If the individual is in a
county jail, such consent and compliance shall be conditions for
release.
1. The individual shall maintain at least ninety percent (90%)
attendance at all scheduled competency restoration education
appointments with a local Department facility or a locally certified
provider.
2. The individual shall maintain at least eighty-five percent
(85%) compliance with prescribed medication, as recommended by the
treating Department facility or locally certified provider, to
prevent symptom relapse or clinical deterioration.
3. The community-based outpatient competency restoration
provider shall submit a written report to the court once per month
regarding the compliance and progress of the individual, or lack
thereof. The report shall be submitted no later than the fifteenth
day of each month for the participation of the individual during the
preceding month.
4. If the individual fails or refuses to participate in the
ordered community-based outpatient competency restoration treatment,
Req. No. 16023 Page 17

as p rovided in this section, the provider shall report the violation
to the court within seventy-two (72) hours of the violation. The
report shall include a description of the violation. Upon receipt
of the report, the court shall issue a warrant for the individual,
who shall be taken into custody and returned to the county jail
pending further order of the court.
5. If community-based outpatient competency restoration is
unsuccessful, the court shall modify its order to require the
individual to participate in inpatient competency restoration
treatment. Upon issuance of the modified order, the court shall set
a date certain for the individual to report to an inpatient forensic
competency restoration program designated by the Department. If the
individual is in the county jail, the individual shall be
transported to the designated inpatient forensic competency
restoration program.
6. If, at any time, the Department determines that an
individual committed to community-based outpatient competency
restoration requires an inpatient level of care, the Department
shall notify the court. Upon receipt of such notice, the court
shall issue an order requiring inpatient competency restoration
treatment. Upon issuance of the order, the individual shall report
to or be transported to an inpatient forensic competency restoration
program designated by the Department.

Req. No. 16023 Page 18

7. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an individual
participating in community-based outpatient competency restoration
from receiving additional treatment or support services including
peer support, case management, or therapy, as determined to be
clinically appropriate or beneficial based on an assessment by the
local Department facility or a locally certified provider.
C. The court may shall not commit to the incompetent person to
the custody of the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services unless the person is a person requiring treatment as
defined by Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes for the purpose of
competency evaluation or restoration, any person who is currently
serving an active sentence without a motion to accelerate or motion
to revoke having been filed in the associated case.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all persons
subject to such terms regardless of whether the criminal sentencing
of the person occurred before or after the effective date of this
act. In the event of a conflict between subsection M of Section
1005.1 of this title, the provisions of this section shall control.
D. The court may allow the person to receive treatment from
private facilities if such facilities are willing, and neither the
state nor the court fund is required to directly pay for such care.
E. In no event shall an individual deemed incompetent
individual by reason of mental illness be involuntarily committed to

Req. No. 16023 Page 19

the legal custody of the Department of Human Services or any of its
facilities.
1. If the person is not committed to the custody of the
Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services, the court
may appoint a medical supervisor for a course of treatment. The
medical supervisor of treatment may be any person or agency that
agrees to supervise the course of treatment. The proposed treatment
may be either inpatient or outpatient care depending on the
facilities and resources available to the court and the type of
disability sought to be corrected by the order of the court. The
court shall require the medical supervisor to provide periodic
progress reports to the court and may pay for the services of the
medical supervisor from court funds.
2. The court may allow the person to receive treatment from
private facilities if such facilities are willing. Neither the
state nor the court fund shall be required to directly pay for such
care.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1175.8, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1175.8. If the medical supervisor reports a report from
a qualified forensic evaluator opines that the person appears to
have achieved competency after a finding of incompetency, the court
shall hold another competency hearing within twenty (20) days of
receipt of the evaluation to determine if stipulate that the person
Req. No. 16023 Page 20

has achieved competency. If competency has been achieved, the
criminal proceedings shall be resumed.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16023 GRS 02/03/26



















Req. No. 16023 Page 21